Utah statutes.
53-3-503.   Exemption for college, university, and high school programs.

This part does not apply to any person giving driver training lessons to schools or classes conducted by colleges, universities, and high schools for regularly enrolled full-time students as a part of the normal program for the institutions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

